North Carolina, session 2025, SB947.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-917. Military influence areas.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Major military installation. – Defined in G.S. 143-151.71(5).
(2) Military influence area. – All property within 5 miles of the property line of a
major military installation.
(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-601(d), a local government may adopt and enforce a
zoning regulation or unified development ordinance which provides specific requirements for
military influence areas, provided that such zoning regulation or unified development ordinance
contains, at minimum, the following standards:
(1) All development approvals within the military influence area shall require the
applicant to submit proof of coordination with the Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs to demonstrate that the proposed project will not have an
adverse effect on the operational readiness of a major military installation.
(2) The governing board or planning commission shall incorporate into all
development approvals a statement that the proposed project will not impede
training operations or other military activity within the major military
installation.
(3) Prior to any public hearing pertaining to a quasi-judicial or administrative
decision regarding property within a military influence area, the deciding body
shall provide notice of the hearing to the commander of the affected major
military installation by certified mail not less than 10 days nor more than 25
days before the date fixed for the hearing. Such notice must provide, at
minimum, a description of the property and the nature of the decision to be
considered at the hearing.
(4) Any site plan for a property within a military influence area shall utilize
buffering or screening to mitigate the impacts of light and noise on the major
military installation and to protect the privacy of the major military
installation.
*S947-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a zoning regulation or unified
development ordinance regulating a military influence area is subject to the requirements of this
Chapter.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as denying a property owner their vested
rights under Article 1 of this Chapter."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Military Affairs
Commission of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs for the 2026-2027 fiscal year
the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds to conduct a joint land-use
study between major military installations and local governments affected by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 947-First Edition